District of Columbia statutes.
32-1611.01

Mandatory partner programs.

(a)

With the approval of the Mayor, WIC shall develop and enter into a memorandum of agreement with mandatory partner programs consistent with the requirements of section 121(c) of the Federal Act.

(b)

To the extent that they are available in the District, the mandatory partner programs required by subsection (a) of this section shall include the:

(1)

Workforce Investment Act Adult program;

(2)

Workforce Investment Act Youth program;

(3)

Workforce Investment Act Dislocated Worker program;

(4)

Wagner-Peyser Act programs and activities;

(5)

Local Veterans Outreach program;

(6)

Disabled Veterans Outreach program;

(7)

Trade Adjustment Assistance;

(8)

Senior Community Service Employment Program, as authorized under Title V of the Older Americans Act of 1965, approved October 17, 2006 (120 Stat. 2522; 42 U.S.C. § 3056);

(9)

Unemployment insurance programs authorized under District of Columbia unemployment compensation laws;

(10)

Vocational rehabilitation programs, as authorized under Parts A and B of the Title I of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, approved August 7, 1998 (112 Stat. 1093; 29 U.S.C. § 720);

(11)

Any postsecondary career and technical education activities authorized under the Vocational Education Act of 1963, approved August 12, 2006 (120 Stat. 684; 20 U.S.C. § 2301);

(12)

Adult education and literacy activities authorized under Title II of WIA;

(13)

Employment and training activities carried out under the Community Services Block Grant Act, approved October 27, 1998 (112 Stat. 2728; 42 U.S.C.§ 9901);

(14)

Job-readiness training and employment-placement assistance under section 3 of the Housing and Urban Development Act of 1968, approved August 1, 1968 (82 Stat. 476; 12 U.S.C. § 1701u); or

(15)

Job Corps activities.

History

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 12a
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-263, § 2(m), 62 DCR 1518